Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2509.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 169
RECOGNITION OF NATIVE AMERICAN TRIBES
42-169-1. Petition for recognition.
A Native American tribe may petition the state for recognition by providing the house of
representatives with the following documentation:
(1) A statement of facts establishing that the tribe has been identified from historical times
until the present on a substantially continuous basis as "American Indian" or "aboriginal";
(2) Evidence that a substantial portion of the group inhabits a specific area or lives in a
community viewed as American Indian and that its members are descendants of an Indian tribe
which historically inhabited a specific area;
(3) Evidence that the tribe has maintained tribal political authority or influence over its
members as an autonomous entity throughout history until the present;
(4) A copy of the tribe's governing document, including membership criteria, or, if it does
not have a formal governing document, a description of its membership criteria and governing
procedures;
(5) An official membership list, any available former lists, and evidence that current

members descend from a historic tribe or tribes that combined into a single autonomous political
entity;
(6) Evidence that the tribe consists mainly of people who are not members of an
acknowledged North American Indian tribe; and
(7) A statement that the tribe is not the subject of the congressional legislation that has
terminated or forbidden the federal trust relationship (pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution
108 (HCR 108) of 1953).
42-169-2. Legislative power.
The general assembly is granted the authority to forward a petition for state recognition to
the governor for enactment through legislation; provided, however, the general assembly has the
authority to impose restrictions on the following activities:
(1) Gaming licensure and/or permission to establish a casino;
(2) Creation of a state reservation or relinquishment of government land; and
(3) Approval for state sales tax-free economic development ventures.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004555
========
LC004555 - Page 2 of 3